New York, session 2025-2026, A10434.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "public civil rights accountability act". 3 § 2. Legislative findings. The legislature finds that public employees 4 serve all residents of the state of New York and must uphold the civil 5 rights protections guaranteed under federal and state law, including but 6 not limited to Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 and the New 7 York state human rights law. 8 The legislature further finds that unlawful discrimination undermines 9 public trust, causes harm to individuals and communities, and interferes 10 with the ability of public institutions to fulfill their missions. 11 The legislature declares that it is necessary to ensure that all 12 public employees receive clear notice of their obligations under civil 13 rights law and are held accountable for violations. 14 § 3. The civil service law is amended by adding a new section 159-e to 15 read as follows: 16 § 159-e. Civil rights compliance certification. 1. Definition. For 17 purposes of this section, "public employee" shall mean any officer or 18 employee of the state, a public authority, public benefit corporation, 19 state university, city university, public school district, or any poli- 20 tical subdivision of the state. 21 2. Certification requirement. Every public employer shall require each 22 newly hired public employee to complete a civil rights compliance 23 certification as a condition of employment. Such certification shall 24 include written acknowledgment that such employee: 25 (a) has received notice of federal and state laws prohibiting discrim- 26 ination, including but not limited to: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15041-01-6 A. 10434 2 1 (i) Title VII of the Civil Rights Act of 1964, and 2 (ii) the New York state human rights law; 3 (b) understands their legal obligation to comply with such laws; and 4 (c) understands that unlawful discrimination, harassment, or creation 5 of a hostile work or educational environment may result in disciplinary 6 action, including termination. 7 3. Training requirement. (a) All public employees shall complete civil 8 rights and anti-discrimination training: 9 (i) within ninety days of hire; and 10 (ii) annually. 11 (b) Such training shall include prevention of discrimination based on 12 race, color, national origin, religion, sex, disability, sexual orien- 13 tation, gender identity or expression, and any other protected class 14 under law. 15 4. Enforcement. (a) Failure to complete certification or training 16 required under this section may result in administrative action, includ- 17 ing suspension until compliance is achieved. 18 (b) Violation of civil rights laws in the course of public employment 19 shall constitute misconduct and may result in disciplinary action pursu- 20 ant to section seventy-five of this chapter and other applicable laws. 21 § 4. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 296-e to 22 read as follows: 23 § 296-e. Civil rights compliance in public employment. All public 24 employers shall implement policies and procedures to comply with section 25 one hundred fifty-nine-e of the civil service law. 26 § 5. Severability clause. If any clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivi- 27 sion, section or part of this act shall be adjudged by any court of 28 competent jurisdiction to be invalid, such judgment shall not affect, 29 impair, or invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in 30 its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, section 31 or part thereof directly involved in the controversy in which such judg- 32 ment shall have been rendered. It is hereby declared to be the intent of 33 the legislature that this act would have been enacted even if such 34 invalid provisions had not been included herein. 35 § 6. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 36 have become a law.